Utah statutes.
41-1a-224.   Registration of specially constructed, reconstructed, or
foreign vehicles -- Surrender of foreign registration.
(1)  If the vehicle to be registered is a specially constructed,
reconstructed, or foreign vehicle, that fact shall be stated in the
application.
(2)  The owner of a foreign vehicle that has been registered outside of this
state shall surrender to the division all registration cards, certificates of
title, or other evidence of foreign registration in his possession or under
his control, except as provided in Section 41-1a-223.
